Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 16. Dissolution.
§ 13.1-749.1.
Election to purchase in lieu of dissolution.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, in a proceeding under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-747

to dissolve a corporation, the corporation may elect or, if it fails to elect, one or more shareholders may elect to purchase all shares owned by the petitioning shareholder at the fair value of the shares. An election pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable unless the court determines that it is equitable to set aside or modify the election.

An election to purchase pursuant to this section may be filed with the court at any time within 90 days after the filing of the petition under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-747

or at such later time as the court in its discretion may allow. If the election to purchase is filed by one or more shareholders, the corporation shall, within 10 days thereafter, give written notice to all shareholders, other than the petitioner. The notice shall state the name and number of shares owned by the petitioner and the name and number of shares owned by each electing shareholder and shall advise the recipients of their right to join in the election to purchase shares in accordance with this section. Shareholders who wish to participate shall file notice of their intention to join in the purchase no later than 30 days after the effectiveness of the notice to them. All shareholders who have filed an election or notice of their intention to participate in the election to purchase thereby become parties to the proceeding and shall participate in the purchase in proportion to their ownership of outstanding shares as of the date the first election was filed, unless they otherwise agree or the court otherwise directs. After an election has been filed by the corporation or one or more shareholders, the proceeding under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-747

may not be discontinued or settled, nor may the petitioning shareholder sell or otherwise dispose of the petitioner’s shares, unless the court determines that it would be equitable to the corporation and the shareholders, other than the petitioner, to permit such discontinuance, settlement, sale, or other disposition.

If, within 60 days of the filing of the first election, the parties reach agreement as to the fair value and terms of purchase of the petitioner’s shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase of petitioner’s shares upon the terms and conditions agreed to by the parties.

If the parties are unable to reach an agreement as provided for in subsection C, the court, upon application of any party, shall stay the proceedings under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-747

and determine the fair value of the petitioner’s shares as of the day before the date on which the petition under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-747

was filed or as of such other date as the court deems appropriate under the circumstances. The determination of fair value shall include consideration of all relevant facts and circumstances, including, unless the court determines it would be unjust or inequitable to do so, (i) the petitioner’s minority status, (ii) the marketability of the petitioner’s shares, (iii) the relevant terms of any shareholders’ agreement, and (iv) if the court finds that the value of the corporation has been diminished by the wrongful conduct of controlling shareholders, the petitioner’s proportionate claim for any compensable corporate injury. In determining the fair value, the court may, in its discretion, select an appraiser to appraise the fair value of the petitioner’s shares and shall assess the cost of any such appraisal to the parties, to the corporation, or both, as the equities may appear to the court.

Upon determining the fair value of the shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase upon such terms and conditions as the court deems appropriate, which may include payment of the purchase price in installments, where necessary in the interests of equity, provision for security to assure payment of the purchase price and any additional costs, fees and expenses as may have been awarded, and, if the shares are to be purchased by shareholders, the allocation of shares among them. In allocating petitioner’s shares among holders of different classes of shares, the court should attempt to preserve the existing distribution of voting rights among holders of different classes insofar as practicable and may direct that holders of a specific class or classes shall not participate in the purchase. Interest may be allowed at the rate and from the date determined by the court to be equitable, but if the court finds that the refusal of the petitioning shareholder to accept an offer of payment was arbitrary or otherwise not in good faith, no interest shall be allowed. If the court finds that the petitioning shareholder had probable grounds for relief under subdivision A 1 b or d of §

13.1-747

, it may award expenses to the petitioning shareholder.

Upon entry of an order under subsection C or E, the court shall dismiss the petition to dissolve the corporation under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-747

and the petitioning shareholder shall no longer have any rights or status as a shareholder of the corporation, except the right to receive the amounts awarded to him by the order of the court, which shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other judgment.

The purchase ordered pursuant to subsection E shall be made within 10 days after the date the order becomes final.

Any payment by the corporation pursuant to an order under subsection C or E, other than an award of expenses pursuant to subsection E, is subject to the provisions of §

13.1-653

.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 deleted “that is not a public corporation” following “to dissolve a corporation” in subsection A and substituted “and shall advise” for “and must advise” in the third sentence of subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 rewrote subsection G.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 added the second sentence of subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, substituted “effectiveness” for “effective date,” and inserted “outstanding” following “ownership of”; in subsection E, inserted “expenses” following “may award,” and deleted “reasonable fees and expenses of counsel and of any experts employed by the shareholder” at the end; and in subsection H, deleted “fees and” preceding “expenses.”

Law Review.

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Stay for additional discovery. —

Because the only issue to determine was the fair value of a shareholder’s shares, and because the corporation had provided and would continue to provide information that related to its value, it would be meaningless to vacate an order granting a stay under §

13.1-749.1

to permit the shareholder unrestricted discovery. Hartley v. Marco Invs., Inc., 82 Va. Cir. 294, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 174 (Norfolk Feb. 24, 2011).

Valuation date. —

In a case in which defendant and plaintiff were 50% shareholders in a corporation, the court found that the statutory valuation date of August 1, 2019, was both equitable and appropriate because plaintiff’s alleged actions since she filed for dissolution — even if they damaged the corporation — would not make the August 1, 2019, valuation date inequitable, and any alternative valuation date at the current stage in the litigation would be unduly burdensome; defendant had not proposed an alternative valuation date; and the April 16, 2020, order directed that plaintiff would be held liable to the corporation for any harm she caused the corporation since September 2019. Biton v. Kreinis, 105 Va. Cir. 86, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 69 (Norfolk May 1, 2020).

Fair value determination. —

Court did not err in finding the fair value of the company’s equity using the discounted cash method was $532,582 and that plaintiff’s shares were valued at $177,530 because application of the marketability discount would be unjust and inequitable as plaintiff established oppressive conduct by defendant and the third shareholder, and plaintiff should not receive less than the fair value of his shares simply where defendant elected to purchase plaintiff’s shares in lieu of the corporate dissolution; and because the value of the corporation had not been diminished by the controlling shareholders. Jones v. A Town Smoke House & Catering Inc., 106 Va. Cir. 168, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 478 (Waynesboro Oct. 19, 2020).

Payment plan for election to purchase. —

Based on the evidence, the court found that, in the interests of equity, payment of the purchase price in installments was warranted, with a $150,000 initial payment, payable within 60 days, and monthly payments of $30,000 thereafter until all amounts owed were paid. The Court also found that providing the seller security was appropriate to ensure payment and awarded the seller a first-priority perfected lien on the corporation’s current and future assets as well as on all of its stock. Biton v. Kreinis, 105 Va. Cir. 86, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 94 (Norfolk July 10, 2020).

Determination of corporate assets. —

Certain leases and related rights were corporate assets for purposes of a purchasing shareholder’s election to purchase the other shareholder’s shares in lieu of dissolution of a corporation in which the parties were equal shareholders because, although the parties’ actions regarding the transfer of the leases did not conform to the parties’ agreement, the court did not find a proper basis for waiver, estoppel, or a contract modification in that the parties operated stores under the leases as corporate entities as envisioned by the agreement. Biton v. Kreinis, 105 Va. Cir. 86, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 50 (Norfolk Apr. 16, 2020).

§ 13.1-750.
Articles of termination of corporate existence.

When a corporation has distributed all of its assets to its creditors and shareholders and voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, it shall deliver to the Commission for filing articles of termination of corporate existence. The articles shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

That all the assets of the corporation have been distributed to its creditors and shareholders; and

That the dissolution of the corporation has not been revoked.

With the articles of termination of corporate existence, the corporation shall file a statement certifying that the corporation has filed returns and has paid all state taxes to the time of the statement. In contemplation of submitting the required statement, the corporation may file returns and pay taxes before such returns and taxes would otherwise be due.

If the Commission finds that the articles of termination of corporate existence comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall by order issue a certificate of termination of corporate existence. When the certificate is effective, the existence of the corporation shall cease, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings and appropriate corporate action by shareholders, directors and officers as provided in this chapter.

The statement “that all the assets of the corporation have been distributed to its creditors and shareholders” means that the corporation has divested itself of all its assets by the payment of claims or liquidating dividends or by assignment to a trustee or trustees for the benefit of claimants or shareholders. If any shareholder, certificate holder, member, bondholder, or other security holder, or a participating patron of a cooperative who is entitled to a share in the distribution of the assets cannot be found, the corporation may thereupon, and without awaiting the one year mentioned in §

55.1-2513

, pay such person’s share to the State Treasurer as abandoned property on complying with all applicable requirements of §

55.1-2524

except subdivision B 4.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-89; 1956, c. 428; 1966, c. 343; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 291; 2004, c. 162; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-2513” for “55-210.7” and “55.1-2524” for “55-210.12.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 162 substituted “shareholder, certificate holder, member, bondholder, or other security holder, or a participating patron of a cooperative” for “person described in § 55-210.6” in the last sentence of subsection D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “subdivision B 4” for “subdivision 4 of subsection B of that section” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “deliver to the Commission for filing” for “file,” and deleted “with the Commission” following “existence”; in subsection B, substituted “statement” for “certificate”; and in subsection C, substituted “When the certificate is effective” for “Upon the issuance of such certificate.”

§ 13.1-751.
Termination of corporate existence by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the initial directors, or, if initial directors were not named in the articles of incorporation and have not been elected, a majority of the incorporators of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation and terminate its corporate existence by filing with the Commission articles of termination of corporate existence that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date of its incorporation;

Either (i) that none of the corporation’s shares have been issued or (ii) that the corporation has not commenced business;

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued; and

That a majority of the initial directors authorized the dissolution or that initial directors were not named in the articles of incorporation and have not been elected and a majority of the incorporators authorized the dissolution.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-79; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 234; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in the first paragraph, inserted “a majority of” following “been elected”; and rewrote subdivision 2, which was formerly repealed.

§ 13.1-752.
Automatic termination of corporate existence.

If any domestic corporation fails to file its annual report or pay its annual registration fee in a timely manner as required by this chapter, the Commission shall mail to each such corporation a notice of the impending termination of its corporate existence. Whether or not such notice is mailed, if any corporation fails to file its annual report or pay its annual registration fee on or before the last day of the fourth month immediately following its annual report or annual registration fee due date each year, the corporate existence of the corporation shall be automatically terminated as of that day.

If any domestic corporation whose registered agent has filed with the Commission a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-636

fails to file a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-635

within 31 days after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the corporation of the impending termination of its corporate existence. If the corporation fails to file the statement of change before the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending termination notice was mailed, the corporate existence of the corporation shall be automatically terminated as of that day.

The properties and affairs of a corporation whose corporate existence has been terminated pursuant to this section shall pass automatically to its directors as trustees in liquidation. The trustees shall then proceed to (i) collect the assets of the corporation, (ii) sell, convey, and dispose of such of its properties that are not to be distributed in kind to its shareholders, (iii) pay, satisfy, and discharge its liabilities and obligations, and (iv) do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs. After paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, the trustees shall distribute the remainder of its assets, either in cash or in kind, among its shareholders according to their respective rights and interests.

No officer, director, or agent of a corporation shall have any personal obligation for any of the liabilities of the corporation whether such liabilities arise in contract, tort, or otherwise, solely by reason of the termination of the corporation’s existence pursuant to this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-91; 1956, c. 428; 1970, c. 4; 1974, c. 72; 1975, c. 500; 1985, cc. 522, 528; 1987, c. 2; 1988, c. 405; 1991, c. 125; 1997, c. 216; 2000, c. 52; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 753.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 52, which added subsection C, in cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any domestic or foreign corporation, domestic or foreign limited liability company, or domestic or foreign limited partnership whose registered agent files a certificate of resignation with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to §§

13.1-636

,

13.1-765

,

13.1-835

,

13.1-927

,

13.1-1017

, or §

50-73.6

of the Code of Virginia on or after January 1, 2001.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “the last day of the fourth month immediately following its annual report due date each year” for “September 1 of the year it is due” and substituted “as of that day” for “as of September 1”; in subdivision B 1, substituted “the corporation’s annual report due date determined in accordance with subsection C of §

13.1-775

” for “April 1 (following the January assessment)” in the first sentence and substituted “after such date” for “after April 1” in the second sentence; and, in subdivision B 2, substituted “the due date” for “June 1” in the first sentence and substituted “the last day of the fourth month immediately following the due date” for “September 1” in the second sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 52 added subsection C.
For applicability, see editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “shareholders” for “stockholders” in the third and fourth sentences of subdivision B 2; and in subsection C, substituted “a statement” for “his statement” and deleted “of this section” following “B 2”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 1987 survey of Virginia business and corporate law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 645 (1987).

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

§ 13.1-753.
Involuntary termination of corporate existence.

The corporate existence of a corporation may be terminated involuntarily by order of the Commission when it finds that the corporation (i) has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law; (ii) has failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in this Commonwealth as required by law; (iii) has failed to file any document required by this chapter to be filed with the Commission; or (iv) has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its officers and directors constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth. Upon termination, the properties and affairs of the corporation shall pass automatically to its directors as trustees in liquidation. The trustees then shall proceed to collect the assets of the corporation; sell, convey and dispose of such of its properties as are not to be distributed in kind to its shareholders; pay, satisfy and discharge its liabilities and obligations; and do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs. After paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, the trustees shall distribute the remainder of its assets, either in cash or in kind, among its shareholders according to their respective rights and interests. A corporation whose existence is terminated pursuant to clause (iv) shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

Any corporation convicted of the offense listed in clause (iv) of subsection A shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction.

Before entering any such order the Commission shall issue a rule against the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-93; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 506; 1968, c. 116; 1975, cc. 88, 500; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 310; 2008, cc. 588, 770.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted clause (iv), added the last sentence, and made related changes; added subsection B; and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

§ 13.1-754.
Reinstatement of a corporation that has ceased to exist.

A corporation that has ceased to exist pursuant to this article may apply to the Commission for reinstatement within five years thereafter unless the corporate existence was terminated by order of the Commission (i) upon a finding that the corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law or (ii) entered pursuant to §

13.1-749

and the circuit court’s decree directing dissolution contains no provision for reinstatement of corporate existence.

To have its corporate existence reinstated, the corporation shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement, which shall include the identification number issued by the Commission to the corporation, and which may be in the form of a letter signed by an officer or director of the corporation, or which may be by affidavit signed by an agent of any shareholder’s interests stating that after diligent search by such agent, no officer or director can be found;

A reinstatement fee of $100;

All annual registration fees and penalties that were due before the corporation ceased to exist and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the corporation’s existence had not been terminated;

An annual report for the calendar year that corresponds to the calendar year of the latest annual registration fee that was assessed or that would have been assessed to the date of reinstatement;

If the name of the corporation does not comply with the provisions of §

13.1-630

at the time of reinstatement, articles of amendment to the articles of incorporation to change the corporation’s name to a name that satisfies the provisions of §

13.1-630

, with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of articles of amendment; and

If the corporation’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-635

.

If the corporation complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement of corporate existence. Upon entry of the order, the corporate existence shall be deemed to have continued from the date of termination as if the termination had never occurred, and any liability incurred by the corporation or a director, officer, or other agent after the termination and before the reinstatement is determined as if the termination of the corporation’s existence had never occurred.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-92; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 88; 1978, c. 804; 1980, c. 654; 1982, c. 648; 1984, c. 69; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 234; 1988, c. 405; 2004, c. 601; 2005, c. 379; 2006, c. 663; 2015, c. 623.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 substituted “and any liability incurred by the corporation or a director, officer, or other agent after termination of corporate existence and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the termination of corporate existence had never occurred” for “except that reinstatement shall have no effect on any question of personal liability of the directors, officers or agents in respect to the period between termination of corporate existence and reinstatement” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in the last sentence, substituted “is not distinguishable upon the records of the Commission,” for “has been assumed or reserved or registered by any other person” and added “to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663 inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii).

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 275.

§ 13.1-755.
Survival of remedy after termination of corporate existence.

The termination of corporate existence shall not take away or impair any remedy available to or against the corporation or its directors, officers, or shareholders for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The shareholders, directors, and officers shall have power to take such corporate or other action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-101; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article surveying major developments between 1991 and 1992 that affect business and corporate law in Virginia, see “Business and Corporate Law,” 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 653 (1992).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 16; 2C M.J. Bankruptcy, § 12; 4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 35, 262, 276, 277.

§ 13.1-756.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 405.